src/pron-mrj-morph.txt
LEXICON PronTag
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON DemTag
+Dem+Adn: # ;
+Dem+Pron: Dem-Cx ;
!! What are these тӹдӹмӓт, тӹдӹлӓнӓт

LEXICON Dem-Cx
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Gen:%>н K ;
+Sg+Acc:%>м K ;
+Sg+Dat:%>лА1н K ;

+Pl+Nom:%>влӓ K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>влӓ%>н K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>влӓ%>м K ;
+Pl+Dat:%>влӓ%>лА1н K ;
